Massachusetts, session 194th, S2045.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (a) of part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (20) the following clause:-
“(21) An amount equal to 50 per cent of the cost of tuition payments made by the
taxpayer to a public institution of higher education, as defined by section 5 of chapter 15A, in
which the taxpayer or a dependent of said taxpayer is enrolled, less any scholarships, grants or
financial aid received. No deduction shall be allowed under this subparagraph if a deduction is
claimed under subparagraph (11).”
of 1